Utah statutes.
17-27a-407.   Effect of official maps.

(1)  Counties may adopt an official map.

(2) (a)  An official map does not:

(i)  require a landowner to dedicate and construct a street as a condition of development approval, except under circumstances provided in Subsection (2)(b)(iii); or

(ii)  require a county to immediately acquire property it has designated for eventual use as a public street.

(b)  This section does not prohibit a county from:

(i)  recommending that an applicant consider and accommodate the location of the proposed streets in the planning of a development proposal in a manner that is consistent with Section 17-27a-507;

(ii)  acquiring the property through purchase, gift, voluntary dedication, or eminent domain; or

(iii)  requiring the dedication and improvement of a street if the street is found necessary by the county because of a proposed development and if the dedication and improvement is consistent with Section 17-27a-507.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

